Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 14
IDAHO HOSPITAL ASSESSMENT ACT

Sec.

§ 56-1401. Short title — Legislative intent.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Hospital Assessment Act.”

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the maximization of financial resources eligible and available for medicaid services by establishing a fund within the Idaho department of health and welfare to receive private hospital assessments to use in securing federal matching funds under federally prescribed upper payment limit and disproportionate share hospital programs available through the state medicaid plan.

§ 56-1402. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Disproportionate share hospital” means a hospital that serves a disproportionate share of medicaid low-income patients as compared to other hospitals as determined by department rule.

“Governmental entity” means and includes the state and its political subdivisions.

“Hospital” is as defined in section 39-1301(a), Idaho Code.

“Political subdivision” means a county, city, municipal corporation or hospital taxing district and, as used in this chapter, shall include state licensed hospitals established by counties pursuant to chapter 36, title 31, Idaho Code, or jointly by cities and counties pursuant to chapter 37, title 31, Idaho Code.

“Private hospital” means a hospital that is not owned by a governmental entity.

“Upper payment limit” means a limitation established by federal regulations, 42 CFR 447.272 and 42 CFR 447.321, that disallows federal matching funds when state medicaid agencies pay certain classes of hospitals an aggregate amount for inpatient and outpatient hospital services that would exceed the amount that would be paid for the same services furnished by that class of hospitals under medicare payment principles.

§ 56-1403. Hospital assessment fund established.

There is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer a dedicated fund to be known as the hospital assessment fund, hereinafter “fund,” to be administered by the department of health and welfare, hereinafter “department.” The state treasurer shall invest idle moneys in the fund and any interest received on those investments shall be returned to the fund.

Moneys in the fund shall consist of:

All moneys collected or received by the department from private hospital assessments required by this chapter;

All federal matching funds received by the department as a result of expenditures made by the department that are attributable to moneys deposited in the fund;

Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction with the administration of this chapter; and

Any appropriations, federal funds, donations, gifts or moneys from any other sources.

The fund is created for the purpose of receiving moneys in accordance with this section and section 56-1404, Idaho Code. The fund shall not be used to replace any moneys appropriated to the Idaho medical assistance program by the legislature. Moneys in the fund shall be distributed by the department subject to appropriation for the following purposes only:

Payments to private hospitals as required under Idaho’s medical assistance program as set forth in sections 56-209b through 56-209d, Idaho Code;

Reimbursement of moneys collected by the department from private hospitals through error or mistake in performing the activities authorized under Idaho’s medical assistance program;

Payments of administrative expenses incurred by the department or its agent in performing the activities authorized by this chapter;

Payments made to the federal government to repay excess payments made to private hospitals from the fund if the assessment plan is deemed out of compliance and after the state has appealed the findings. Hospitals shall refund the payments in question to the assessment fund. The state in turn shall return funds to both the federal government and hospital providers in the same proportion as the original financing. Individual hospitals shall be reimbursed based on the proportion of the individual hospital’s assessment to the total assessment paid by all private hospitals. If a hospital is unable to refund payments, the state shall develop a payment plan and deduct moneys from future medicaid payments;

Transfers to any other fund in the state treasury, provided such transfers shall not exceed the amount transferred previously from that other fund into the hospital assessment fund; and

Making refunds to hospitals pursuant to section 56-1410, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1404. Assessments.

All private hospitals, except those exempted under section 56-1408, Idaho Code, shall make payments to the fund in accordance with this chapter. Subject to section 56-1410, Idaho Code, an annual assessment on both inpatient and outpatient services is determined for each qualifying hospital for each state fiscal year in an amount calculated by multiplying the rate, as set forth in subsections (2)(b) and (3)(b) of this section, by the assessment base, as set forth in subsection (5) of this section.

The department shall calculate the private hospital upper payment limit gap for both inpatient and outpatient services. The upper payment limit gap is the difference between the maximum allowable payments eligible for federal match, less medicaid payments not financed using hospital assessment funds. The upper payment limit gap shall be calculated separately for hospital inpatient and outpatient services. Medicaid disproportionate share payments shall be excluded from the calculation.
(2)(a) The department shall calculate the private hospital upper payment limit gap for both inpatient and outpatient services. The upper payment limit gap is the difference between the maximum allowable payments eligible for federal match, less medicaid payments not financed using hospital assessment funds. The upper payment limit gap shall be calculated separately for hospital inpatient and outpatient services. Medicaid disproportionate share payments shall be excluded from the calculation.

The department shall calculate the upper payment limit assessment rate for each state fiscal year to be the percentage that, when multiplied by the assessment base as defined in subsection (5) of this section, equals the upper payment limit gap determined in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The department shall calculate the disproportionate share allotment amount to be paid to private in-state hospitals.
(3)(a) The department shall calculate the disproportionate share allotment amount to be paid to private in-state hospitals.

The department shall calculate the disproportionate share assessment rate for private in-state hospitals to be the percentage that, when multiplied by the assessment base as defined in subsection (5) of this section, equals the amount of state funding necessary to pay the private in-state hospital disproportionate share allotment determined in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

For private in-state hospitals, the assessments calculated pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not be greater than two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the assessment base as defined in subsection (5) of this section.

The assessment base shall be the hospital’s net patient revenue for the applicable period. “Net patient revenue” for state fiscal year 2009 shall be determined using the most recent data available from each hospital’s fiscal year 2004 medicare cost report on file with the department on June 30, 2008, without regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. Net patient revenue for each state fiscal year thereafter shall be determined in the same manner using a rolling yearly schedule for each hospital’s fiscal year medicare cost report on file with the department on June 30 of each subsequent year without regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data.

§ 56-1405. Review of annual assessment amount.

Each state fiscal year, hospitals shall have at least thirty (30) days prior to implementation to review and verify the assessment base, rate, and the estimated assessment amount.

§ 56-1406. Inpatient and outpatient adjustment payments.

All private hospitals, except those exempted under section 56-1408, Idaho Code, shall be eligible for inpatient and outpatient adjustments as follows:

For state fiscal year 2009, the inpatient upper payment limit gap for private hospitals shall be divided by medicaid inpatient days for the same hospitals from calendar year 2007 to establish an average per diem adjustment rate. Each private hospital shall receive an annual payment that is equal to the average per diem adjustment rate multiplied by the hospital’s calendar year 2007 medicaid inpatient days. For purposes of this section, “hospital medicaid inpatient days” are days of inpatient hospitalization paid for by the Idaho medical assistance program for the applicable calendar year. Each state fiscal year thereafter shall be determined in the same manner using a rolling yearly schedule to determine the hospital inpatient adjustment payment. In the event that either the inpatient upper payment limit gap for private hospitals or the available hospital assessment funding is lower than anticipated, the department shall apply an across-the-board factor such that the inpatient payment adjustments are maximized, financed entirely from hospital assessment funding, and do not exceed the Idaho inpatient upper payment limit for private hospitals. Payments shall be made no later than thirty (30) days after the receipt of the last deposit of the hospital assessment required in section 56-1404, Idaho Code.

For state fiscal year 2009, the outpatient upper payment limit gap for private hospitals shall be divided by medicaid outpatient hospital reimbursement for the same hospitals from calendar year 2007 to establish an average percentage adjustment rate. Each hospital, except those exempt under section 56-1408, Idaho Code, shall receive an annual payment that is equal to the average percentage adjustment rate multiplied by the hospital’s calendar year 2007 hospital medicaid outpatient reimbursement. For purposes of this section, “hospital outpatient reimbursement” is reimbursement for hospital outpatient services paid for by the Idaho medical assistance program for the applicable calendar year. Each state fiscal year thereafter shall be determined in the same manner using a rolling yearly schedule to determine the outpatient hospital adjustment payment. In the event that either the outpatient upper payment limit gap for private hospitals or the available hospital assessment funding is lower than anticipated, the department shall apply an across-the-board factor, such that outpatient adjustment payments are maximized, financed entirely from hospital assessment funding, and do not exceed the Idaho outpatient upper payment limit for private hospitals. Payments shall be made no later than thirty (30) days after the receipt of the last deposit of the hospital assessments required in section 56-1404, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1407. Timing of payments and assessments.

The department shall establish an annual assessment schedule for all payments created under this chapter.

If a hospital fails to pay the full amount of an installment when due, including any extensions granted, there shall be added to the assessment imposed by section 56-1404, Idaho Code, unless waived by the department for reasonable cause, a penalty equal to the lesser of:

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the assessment installment amount not paid on or before the due date, plus five percent (5%) of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the last day of each month thereafter; or

An amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the assessment installment amount not paid on or before the due date.

For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, payments shall be credited first to unpaid installment amounts rather than to penalty or interest amounts, beginning with the most delinquent installment.

§ 56-1408. Exemptions.

State hospital south in Blackfoot, Idaho, and state hospital north in Orofino, Idaho, and the department of veterans affairs medical center in Boise, Idaho, are exempt from the assessment required by section 56-1404, Idaho Code.

A private hospital that does not provide emergency services through an emergency department and is not categorized as “rehabilitation” or “psychiatric” as provided in section II.C. of the “application for hospital licenses and annual report — 2007” by the bureau of facility standards of the department of health and welfare, is exempt from the assessment required by section 56-1404, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1409. Multihospital locations, hospital closure and new hospitals.

If a hospital conducts, operates or maintains more than one (1) hospital licensed by the department, the hospital shall pay the assessment for each hospital separately.

A hospital, subject to assessments under this chapter, that ceases to conduct hospital operations or maintain its state license or did not conduct hospital operations throughout a calendar or fiscal year, shall have its required assessment adjusted by multiplying the assessment computed under section 56-1404, Idaho Code, by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days in the year during which the hospital conducts hospital business, operates a hospital and maintains licensure, and the denominator of which is three hundred sixty-five (365). The hospital shall pay the required assessment computed under section 56-1404, Idaho Code, on the date and in pro rata installments as required by the department for that portion of the state fiscal year during which the hospital operated and maintained state licensure, to the extent not previously paid.

A hospital, subject to assessments under this chapter, that has not been previously licensed as a hospital by the department and that commences hospital operations during a fiscal year, shall pay the required assessment computed under section 56-1404, Idaho Code, and shall be eligible for payment adjustments under section 56-1406, Idaho Code, only after two (2) complete state fiscal years have elapsed and two (2) full fiscal year medicare cost reports are filed with the center for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) after the commencement of operations and on the date as required by the department beginning on the first day of the next state fiscal year.

§ 56-1410. Applicability.

The assessment required by section 56-1404, Idaho Code, shall not take effect or shall cease to be imposed, and any moneys remaining in the fund shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by such hospitals if:

The fund created in section 56-1403, Idaho Code, is used to replace moneys appropriated to the Idaho medical assistance program by the legislature; or

The payments to hospitals required under section 56-1403(3), Idaho Code, are changed or are not eligible for federal matching funds under the Idaho medical assistance program.

The assessment required by section 56-1404, Idaho Code, shall not take effect or shall cease to be required if the assessment is not approved or is determined to be impermissible under title XIX of the social security act. Moneys in the fund derived from assessments required prior thereto shall be distributed in accordance with section 56-1403(3), Idaho Code, to the extent federal matching funds are not reduced due to the impermissibility of the assessments, and any remaining moneys shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by such hospitals.